sv: Konfiguration av bromsservomembran: Dubbelt membran; Enkelt membran; Övrigt
ja: ブレーキブースターダイヤフラム構造: デュアルダイヤフラム; シングルダイヤフラム; その他
pt-BR: Configuração do diafragma do servofreio: Diafragma duplo; Diafragma simples; Outro
tr: Fren servosu diyafram yapılandırması: Çift diyafram; Tek diyafram; Diğer
ro-RO: Configurația diafragmei servofrânei: Diafragmă dublă; Diafragmă simplă; Altele
zh-TW: 煞車增壓器膜片配置: 雙膜片; 單膜片; 其他
lt-LT: Stabdžių stiprintuvo diafragmos konfigūracija: Dviguba diafragma; Viena diafragma; Kita
el: Διαμόρφωση διαφράγματος σερβόφρενου: Διπλό διάφραγμα; Μονό διάφραγμα; Άλλο
th: การจัดเรียงไดอะแฟรมในหม้อลมเบรก: ไดอะแฟรมคู่; ไดอะแฟรมเดี่ยว; อื่นๆ
cs: Konfigurace membrány posilovače brzd: Dvojitá membrána; Jednoduchá membrána; Jiné
es: Configuración del diafragma del servofreno: Doble diafragma; Un diafragma; Otro
de: Konfiguration der Bremskraftverstärkermembran: Doppelmembran; Einzelmembran; Sonstige
fr: Configuration des membranes du servofrein: Diaphragme double; Diaphragme simple; Autre
hr-HR: Konfiguracija membrane pojačivača kočenja: Dvostruka dijafragma; Jednostruka dijafragma; Ostalo
zh-CN: 制动助力器膜片配置: 双膜片; 单膜片; 其他
ko: 브레이크 부스터 다이어프램 구성: 듀얼 다이어프램; 싱글 다이어프램; 기타
sk-SK: Konfigurácia membrány posilňovača bŕzd: Dvojitá membrána; Jednoduchá membrána; Iná
vi: Cấu hình màng ngăn tăng áp phanh: Màng bơm kép; Màng bơm đơn; Khác
hu: Fékrásegítő membrán konfigurációja: Kettős membrán; Szimpla membrán; Egyéb
fi: Jarrutehostimen kalvon kokoonpano: Kaksoiskalvo; Yksöiskalvo; Muu
pl: Konfiguracja membrany serwa hamulcowego: Podwójna membrana; Pojedyncza membrana; Inne
nl: Rembekrachtiger membraan configuratie: Dubbel diafragma; Enkel diafragma; Overig
sl-SI: Konfiguracija diafragme ojačevalnika zavor: Dvojna membrana; Enojna membrana; Drugo
en: Brake booster diaphragm configuration: Dual diaphragm; Single diaphragm; Other
it: Configurazione del diaframma del servofreno: A doppio diaframma; A diaframma singolo; Altro
nb: Konfigurasjon av bremseforsterkermembran: Dobbel membran; Enkel membran; Annet
ru: Конфигурация мембраны усилителя тормозов: Двойная диафрагма; Одинарная диафрагма; Другое
da: Membran-konfiguration i bremseforstærkeren: Dobbelt membran; Enkelt membran; Andet
bg-BG: Конфигурация на мембраната на спирачния сервоусилвател: Двойна мембрана; Единична мембрана; Други
pt-PT: Configuração do diafragma do servofreio: Diafragma duplo; Diafragma simples; Outro